Maryland, session 2026, SB0771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–5A–08 through 5–5A–10 of Article – Human Services of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 5–5A–09 through 5–5A–11, respectively.

SENATE BILL 771 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–512.1 of
Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be transferred to be Section(s)
5–5A–08 of Article – Human Services of the Annotated Code of Maryland.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–102.
(a) The Department shall:
(10) develop and implement a weatherization program in accordance with
Title 4 of this article and administer the low–income weatherization component of the
electric universal service program in accordance with [§ 7–512.1 of the Public Utilities
Article] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
Article – Human Services
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Family Investment Administration.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
5–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(B) “COMMISSION” MEANS THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION.
[(b)] (C) “Energy emergency” means a lack of fuel or the imminent
discontinuation of energy services supplied by a fuel vendor or utility vendor that will
endanger health, safety, or welfare.
[(c)] (D) “Fuel vendor” means a person that distributes, transports, produces, or
offers for sale coal products, fuel oil, kerosene, bottled gas, propane, or wood for fuel use or
consumption in the State.
[(d)] (E) “Office” means the Office of Home Energy Programs.
[(e)] (F) “Program” means the Energy Assistance Program.

SENATE BILL 771
[(f)] (G) “Utility vendor” means a person that distributes, transports, or
produces natural gas or electricity for use or consumption in the State.
5–5A–02.
There is an Office of Home Energy Programs in the Administration.
5–5A–03.
The purpose of the Office is to carry out this subtitle.
5–5A–08.
(a) (1) (I) [The Commission shall establish] THERE IS an electric
universal service program [to assist electric customers with annual incomes at or below
200% of the federal poverty level] IN THE OFFICE.
(II) THE OFFICE SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE
ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE PROGRAM.
(III) THE PURPOSE OF THE ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE
PROGRAM IS TO ASSIST ELECTRIC CUSTOMERS WITH ANNUAL INCOMES AT OR
BELOW 200% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL.
(2) The components of the electric universal service program shall include:
(i) bill assistance;
(ii) low–income residential weatherization; and
(iii) the retirement of arrearages for electric customers who have not
received assistance in retiring arrearages under the ELECTRIC universal service program
within the preceding 5 fiscal years.
(3) The Department of Housing and Community Development is
responsible for administering the low–income residential weatherization component of the
electric universal service program.
(4) [(i) The Department of Human Services, through the Office of Home
Energy Programs, is responsible for administering the bill assistance and the arrearage
retirement components of the electric universal service program.
(ii)] The [Department of Human Services] OFFICE may:

SENATE BILL 771 5
[1.] (I) establish minimum and maximum benefits
available to an electric customer under the bill assistance and arrearage retirement
components; and
[2.] (II) coordinate benefits under the electric universal
service program with benefits under the Maryland Energy Assistance Program and other
available energy assistance programs.
(5) The [Department of Human Services] OFFICE may, with input from a
panel or roundtable of interested parties, contract to assist in administering the bill
assistance and the arrearage retirement components of the electric universal service
program.
(6) The Commission has oversight responsibility for the bill assistance and
the arrearage retirement components of the electric universal service program and any
other funds expended under this section.
(7) In a specific case, the electric universal service program may waive the
income eligibility limitation under paragraph (1) of this subsection in order to provide
assistance to an electric customer who would qualify for a similar waiver under [the
Maryland Energy Assistance Program established under Title 5, Subtitle 5A of the Human
Services Article] ANOTHER PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(8) (i) If an applicant for bill assistance or arrearage retirement is to be
denied due to deficient documentation, the [Department of Human Services] OFFICE shall:
1. promptly provide notice of the deficiency to the applicant;
and
2. afford the applicant ample opportunity of not less than 3
months to cure the deficiency.
(ii) An electric company may not begin the process to terminate
service to an applicant while the applicant is curing a deficiency under this paragraph.
(9) Notwithstanding paragraph (2)(iii) of this subsection, any assistance
received for arrearage retirement by a customer in calendar years 2020 and 2021 may not
be counted toward the limitation on the number of times the customer may receive
assistance for arrearage retirement.
(b) (1) All customers shall contribute to the funding of the electric universal
service program through a charge collected by each electric company.
(2) The Commission shall determine a fair and equitable allocation for
collecting the charges among all customer classes pursuant to subsection (e) of this section.

SENATE BILL 771
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, in accordance
with subsection (f)(6) of this section, any unexpended bill assistance and arrearage
retirement funds returned to customers under subsection (f) of this section shall be
returned to each customer class as a credit in the same proportion that the customer class
contributed charges to the fund.
(4) The Department [of Human Services] shall expend any unexpended bill
assistance and arrearage funds that were collected in fiscal years 2010 through 2017, in
excess of the total amount authorized under subsection (e) of this section, for one or more
of the following purposes:
(i) bill assistance and the retirement of arrearages for customers
who are eligible to receive assistance at the time services are provided;
(ii) targeted and enhanced low–income residential weatherization
designed to remediate households that are considered ineligible to participate in other
State energy efficiency programs due to significant health and safety hazards;
(iii) an arrearage management program for low–income customers in
arrears, including providing credits or matching payments for customers who make timely
payments on current bills; or
(iv) an arrearage prevention program for low–income customers.
(5) An electric company shall recover electric universal service program
costs in accordance with § 7–512 of [this subtitle] THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(6) As determined by the Office [of Home Energy Programs], bill assistance
payments to an electric company may be on a monthly basis for each customer.
(7) The Commission shall determine the allocation of the electric universal
service charge among the generation, transmission, and distribution rate components of all
classes.
(8) The Commission may not assess the electric universal service
surcharge on a per kilowatt–hour basis.
(c) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Commission shall report,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on the electric
universal service program, including:
(i) subject to subsection (e) of this section, a recommendation on the
total amount of funds for the ELECTRIC UNIVERSAL SERVICE program for the following
fiscal year based on:
1. the level of participation in and the amounts expended on
bill assistance and arrearage retirement during the preceding fiscal year;

SENATE BILL 771 7
2. how bill assistance and arrearage retirement payments
were calculated during the preceding fiscal year;
3. the projected needs for the bill assistance and the
arrearage retirement components for the next fiscal year; and
4. the amount of any bill assistance or arrearage retirement
surplus carried over in the electric universal service program fund under subsection (f)(6)(i)
of this section;
(ii) for bill assistance, the total amount of need, as determined by the
Commission, for electric customers with annual incomes at or below 175% of the federal
poverty level and the basis for this determination;
(iii) the amount of funds needed, as determined by the Commission,
to retire arrearages for electric customers who have not received assistance in retiring
arrearages under the electric universal service program within the preceding 7 fiscal years,
and the basis for this determination;
(iv) the amount of funds needed, as determined by the Commission,
for bill assistance and arrearage retirement, respectively, for customers for whom income
limitations may be waived under subsection (a)(7) of this section, and the basis for each
determination;
(v) the impact on customers’ rates, including the allocation among
customer classes, from collecting the total amount recommended by the Commission under
item (i) of this paragraph; and
(vi) the impact of using other federal poverty level benchmarks on
costs and the effectiveness of the electric universal service program.
(2) (i) To assist the Commission in preparing its recommendations
under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Office [of Home Energy Programs] shall report
to the Commission each year on:
1. the number of customers and the amount of distributions
made to fuel customers under the Maryland Energy Assistance Program established under
[Title 5, Subtitle 5A of the Human Services Article] THIS SUBTITLE, identified by funding
source and fuel source;
2. the cost of outreach and education materials provided by
the Office [of Home Energy Programs] for the electric universal service program; and
3. the amount of money that the Department [of Human
Services] receives, and is projected to receive, for low–income energy assistance from:

SENATE BILL 771
A. the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under §
9–20B–05 of the State Government Article;
B. with respect to electric customers only, the Maryland
Energy Assistance Program; and
C. any other federal, State, local, or private source.
(ii) The Office [of Home Energy Programs] may satisfy the reporting
requirement of subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph by providing the Commission with a
copy of material that contains the required information and that the Office [of Home
Energy Programs] submits to the federal government.
(iii) The Commission shall include the information provided by the
Office [of Home Energy Programs] under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph in its report
to the General Assembly under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) Subject to subsection (d)(2) of this section, the Commission shall include
the information provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development
under subsection (d)(1) of this section in its report to the General Assembly under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(4) The electric universal service program shall be subject to audit by the
Office of Legislative Audits in accordance with §§ 2–1220 through 2–1227 of the State
Government Article.
(d) (1) On or before January 1 of each year, the Department of Housing and
Community Development shall report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the General Assembly on the low–income residential
weatherization component of the electric universal service program, including:
(i) the amount of funds expended during the preceding fiscal year;
(ii) the level of participation during the preceding fiscal year,
including the number of households served in each area of the State; and
(iii) the types of projects, including the average cost per unit,
provided to households during the preceding fiscal year.
(2) The Department of Housing and Community Development may satisfy
the reporting requirement under paragraph (1) of this subsection by requesting the
Commission to include the information in the Commission’s report required under
subsection (c) of this section and providing the information to the Commission by the date
specified by the Commission.
(e) The total amount of funds to be collected for the electric universal service
program each year shall be $37 million, allocated in the following manner:

SENATE BILL 771 9
(1) $27.4 million shall be collected from the industrial and commercial
classes; and
(2) $9.6 million shall be collected from the residential class.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “fund” means the electric universal service program
fund.
(2) There is an electric universal service program fund.
(3) (i) 1. The Comptroller shall collect the revenue collected by
electric companies under subsection (b) of this section and place the revenue into the fund.
2. The General Assembly may appropriate funds
supplemental to the funds collected under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph.
(ii) The fund is a continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(iii) The purpose of the fund is to assist electric customers as provided
in subsection (a)(1) of this section.
(4) The Department [of Human Services], with oversight by the
Commission, shall disburse the bill assistance and arrearage retirement funds in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(5) The Comptroller annually shall disburse up to $1,000,000 of
low–income residential weatherization funds to the Department of Housing and
Community Development, as provided in the State budget.
(6) (i) At the end of a given fiscal year, any unexpended bill assistance
and arrearage retirement funds that were collected for that fiscal year shall be retained in
the fund and shall be made available for disbursement through the first 6 months of the
next fiscal year to customers who:
1. qualify for assistance from the fund during the given fiscal
year;
2. apply for assistance from the fund before the end of the
given fiscal year; and
3. remain eligible for assistance at the time services are
provided.
(ii) If the Commission determines that an extension is needed, the
Commission may extend up to an additional 6 months the period in which unexpended bill

SENATE BILL 771
assistance and arrearage retirement funds may be made available for disbursement under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) 1. Any bill assistance and arrearage retirement funds
collected for a given fiscal year that are retained under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
and that remain unexpended at the end of the period allowed under subparagraphs (i) and
(ii) of this paragraph shall be returned to each customer class in the proportion that the
customer class contributed charges to the fund for the given fiscal year in the form of a
credit toward the charge assessed in the following fiscal year.
2. If the Commission determines that it is impractical to
establish a rate credit for the amount to be returned for a given fiscal year to customers
under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, the Commission:
A. may defer the return for not more than 2 additional fiscal
years; and
B. shall combine the returned amount for that fiscal year
with amounts to be returned for the following fiscal years when calculating the rate credit
for the final fiscal year of the period.
(g) (1) If a party to a merger or acquisition of an electric company or an affiliate
of an electric company is required to distribute a credit to the customers in the electric
company’s service territory under an agreement with the Commission in connection with
the merger or acquisition, the Commission shall consider the adequacy of the current
funding of the electric universal service program in providing assistance to customers who
qualify under this section.
(2) Any funds deposited into the electric universal service program fund as
a result of an agreement with the Commission in connection with a merger or acquisition
of an electric company or an affiliate of an electric company are in addition to, and may not
substitute for, funds collected under subsection (e) of this section.
(h) (1) An arrearage prevention program under subsection (b)(4)(iv) of this
section is intended to prevent or reduce arrearages for low–income customers who have
participated in a low–income residential weatherization program.
(2) (i) The ARREARAGE PREVENTION program is intended as a
one–time grant of money to establish ongoing arrearage prevention activities in the State.
(ii) The Department [of Human Services], in consultation with the
Commission, will select for the ARREARAGE PREVENTION program up to two public or
private entities as program recipients to administer the program.
(iii) At least one ARREARAGE PREVENTION program recipient must
primarily serve customers in a major urban area of the State.

SENATE BILL 771 11
(3) [A] AN ARREARAGE PREVENTION program recipient must
demonstrate significant efforts to:
(i) secure additional private investment in rooftop solar
installation, including the use of ARREARAGE PREVENTION program money for credit
enhancement, direct project support, or support for program recipients and customers; and
(ii) provide employment in solar installation to unemployed and
underemployed individuals, with preference for those who reside in the local jurisdiction
where the installations will occur.
(4) The ARREARAGE PREVENTION program may include the installation
of rooftop solar electricity generation equipment after energy efficiency measures at the
residential property have been completed.
Article – Public Utilities
7–505.
(b) (1) The Commission shall issue the orders or adopt the regulations
required under this subsection before the implementation of customer choice.
(2) The Commission shall order a universal service program, to be made
available on a statewide basis, to benefit low–income customers, in accordance with [§
7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE.
7–510.3.
(o) The Commission shall establish procedures for an electric customer that is
receiving electricity supply through a community choice aggregator to receive any bill
assistance credit or arrearage assistance to which the customer may be entitled under [§
7–512.1 of this subtitle] § 5–5A–08 OF THE HUMAN SERVICES ARTICLE or any other
federal or State bill and arrearage assistance administered by the Office of Home Energy
Programs.
Article – State Government
9–20B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.

SENATE BILL 771
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(3) to provide supplemental funds for low–income energy assistance
through [the Electric Universal Service Program established under § 7–512.1 of the Public
Utilities Article and other] electric AND FUEL assistance programs in the Department of
Human Services;
(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) at least 50% shall be credited to an energy assistance account to be used
for [the Electric Universal Service Program and other] electricity AND FUEL assistance
programs in the Department of Human Services;
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That all employees who are
transferred to the Department of Human Services as a result of this Act shall be transferred
without diminution of their rights, benefits, employment, or retirement status.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.